Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-346
Books; examination.

(1) The Director of Banking and Finance, his or her deputy, or any duly appointed examiner shall have power to make a thorough examination into all the books, records, business, and affairs of every building and loan association organized under the laws of this state as often as deemed necessary. The director may accept in his or her discretion, in lieu of any examination authorized by the laws of this state, a report of an examination made of a building and loan association by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Office of Thrift Supervision, or the director may examine any such association jointly with either of these federal agencies.

(2) The director may, at his or her discretion, make available to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Office of Thrift Supervision copies of reports of any such examination or any information furnished to or obtained by him or her in such examination. The rights, powers, duties, and privileges of the director, his or her deputy, or any duly appointed examiner in connection with such examinations shall be the same as is or may be provided by law in reference to the examinations of banks.

Laws 1935, c. 13, § 1, p. 82;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-331;

R.S.1943, § 8-346;

Laws 1953, c. 12, § 1, p. 78;

Laws 1992, LB 757, § 8;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 15.